apertium-ncx.ncx.lexc
LEXICON SujetoVerbal

%<s_sg1%>:n%{i%}%>   	                         SujetoCont ;
@P.Opt.1@%<s_sg1%>:@P.Opt.1@n%{i%}%>                               SujetoCont ; ! 

%<s_sg2%>:t%{i%}%>  	                         SujetoCont ;
%<s_sg3%>:0%>     	                             SujetoCont ;
@P.Opt.1@%<s_sg3%>:@P.Opt.1@0%>                                    SujetoCont ; ! 

@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl1%>:@P.SubjPl.1@t%{i%}%>                               SujetoCont ; ! 
@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl1%>:@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@t%{i%}%>                               SujetoCont ; !  

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Cuando el sujeto es 2 plural (usteded), y el objeto es 1 plural (a nosotros), hay un tipo de harmonía entre 
! los consonantes, y la n del prefijo de sujeto se convierte en t.
!
@P.Num.Unambig@@P.Obj.NotPl1@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Num.Unambig@@P.Obj.NotPl1@@P.SubjPl.1@nan%>                                  SujetoCont ; !   
@P.Num.Unambig@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Num.Unambig@@P.SubjPl.1@tan%>                                  SujetoCont ; !  
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


@P.Subj.3Pl@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl3%>:@P.Subj.3Pl@@P.SubjPl.1@0%>                                    SujetoCont ; !  
@P.Subj.3Pl@@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl3%>:@P.Subj.3Pl@@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@0%>                                    SujetoCont ; !   

@P.Opt.1@%<s_sg2%>:@P.Opt.1@x%{i%}%>                               SujetoCont ; ! 
@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@%<s_pl2%>:@P.Opt.1@@P.SubjPl.1@x%{i%}%>                               SujetoCont ; !  


LEXICON SujetoCont
IV-Dir ;
Objeto ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!
! Intransitive morphemes (lexicon at the end)
!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON IV-Dir
%<and%>:on IV-Adv ;
%<ven%>:ual IV-Adv ;
IV-Adv ;

LEXICON IV-Adv
%<yek%>:yek IV-Raiz ;
%<sen%>:sen IV-Raiz ;
%<pan%>:pan IV-Raiz ;
! ...etc.
IV-Raiz ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Objects for transitive and titransitive verbs
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Objeto
%<o_sg1%>:nech%>    TV-Dir ;
%<o_sg2%>:mits%>    TV-Dir ;
%<o_sg3%>:k%{i%}%>  TV-Dir ;
@D.Obj.NotPl1@%<o_pl1%>:@D.Obj.NotPl1@tech%>    TV-Dir ; ! 
@D.Subj.3Pl@%<o_pl2%>:@D.Subj.3Pl@amech%>   TV-Dir ; ! según flores-nájera 
@R.Subj.3Pl@%<o_pl2%>:@R.Subj.3Pl@namech%>  TV-Dir ; ! con sujeto de tercera persona.  
%<o_pl3%>:ki%{m%}%> TV-Dir ;

TV-Dir ;

DV-IO ;
DV-Dir ;

LEXICON DV-IO
%<i_sg1%>:nech%>    DV-O ;
%<i_sg2%>:mits%>    DV-O ;
%<i_sg3%>:k%{i%}%>  DV-O ;
%<i_pl1%>:tech%>    DV-O ;
%<i_pl2%>:mech%>    DV-O ;
%<i_pl2%>:namech%>  DV-O ; ! con sujeto de tercera persona.
%<i_pl3%>:ki%{m%}%> DV-O ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Transitive (1-object complement) morphemes
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON TV-Dir
%<and%>:on TV-Refl ;
%<ven%>:ual TV-Refl ;
TV-Refl ;

LEXICON TV-Refl
%<refl%>:mo%>  TV-Adv ;
TV-Adv ;

!TODO: resolver dudas sobre la posicón y función de te- y tla- en ncx
LEXICON TV-Te
%<o_aa3%>:te%> TV-Raiz ;
TV-Raiz ;

LEXICON TV-Adv
%<yek%>:yek TV-Adv-Cont ;
%<sen%>:sen TV-Adv-Cont ;
%<pan%>:sen TV-Adv-Cont ;
! ...etc.
TV-Adv-Cont ;

LEXICON TV-Adv-Cont
TV-Tla ;
TV-Te ;
TV-Raiz ;

LEXICON TV-Tla
%<o_nn3%>:tla%> TV-Raiz ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Ditransitive (2 objects) morphemes.
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON DV-O
! for direct obj "im-" ... is this a thing in ncx?
DV-Dir ;

LEXICON DV-Dir
%<and%>:on DV-Refl ;
%<ven%>:ual DV-Refl ;
DV-Refl ;

LEXICON DV-Refl
%<refl%>:mo%>  DV-Adv ;
DV-Adv ;

LEXICON DV-Te
%<o_aa3%>:te%> DV-Raiz ;

LEXICON DV-Tla
%<o_nn3%>:tla%> DV-Raiz ;

LEXICON Te-Tla
%<i_aa3%>%<o_nn3%>:te%>tla%> DV-Raiz ;

LEXICON DV-Adv
%<yek%>:yek DV-Adv-Cont ;
%<sen%>:sen DV-Adv-Cont ;
%<pan%>:sen DV-Adv-Cont ;
! ...etc.
DV-Adv-Cont ;

LEXICON DV-Adv-Cont
Te-Tla  ;
DV-Te   ;
DV-Tla  ;
DV-Raiz ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! TAM stuff for Verbs
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Agr-Pl-Past
@D.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@@R.IsPast.1@:@D.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@@R.IsPast.1@ # ; !   

LEXICON Agr-Sg-Past
@R.IsPast.1@@D.Opt@@D.SubjPl@:@R.IsPast.1@@D.Opt@@D.SubjPl@ # ; !   

LEXICON Agr-Pl-Nonpast
@D.IsPast@@D.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@:@D.IsPast@@D.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@ # ; !   

LEXICON Agr-Sg-Nonpast
@D.IsPast@@D.Opt@@D.SubjPl@:@D.IsPast@@D.Opt@@D.SubjPl@ # ; !   

LEXICON Agr-Sg-Opt
@R.Opt@@D.SubjPl@:@R.Opt@@D.SubjPl@ # ; !  

LEXICON Agr-Pl-Opt
@R.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@:@R.Opt@@R.SubjPl.1@ # ; !  

LEXICON PresentTense
%<pres%>:0     Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>:%>j   Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
@R.Num.Unambig@%<pres%>:@R.Num.Unambig@0     Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! 

LEXICON PreteriteK
%<pret%>:%>k   Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;

LEXICON PreteriteJ
%<pret%>:      Agr-Sg-Past ; ! Dir/LR
%<pret%>:%>j   Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;

LEXICON PreteriteNull
%<pret%>:      Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>:%>kej Agr-Pl-Past ;

LEXICON Imperfect
%<impf%>:%>ya Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<impf%>:%>ya%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;

LEXICON Future
%<fut%>:%>s Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>:%>s%>kej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<fut%>:%>s Neki-Aux ;

LEXICON Durative
%<dur%>%<pres%>:%>to%>k Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<dur%>%<pres%>:%>to%>k%>ej Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<dur%>:%>to Imperfect ;
%<dur%>:%>to Future ;

LEXICON Optative
%<opt%>:0 Agr-Sg-Opt ;
%<opt%>:%>kan Agr-Pl-Opt ;

LEXICON Conditional
%<cond%>:%>skia    Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<cond%>:%>skia%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase1
        PresentTense ;
        PreteriteK ;
        Imperfect ;
        Future ;
        Conditional ;
        Durative ;
        Optative ;
        SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Panoa
0:a       PresentTense ;
          PreteriteK ;
0:a       Imperfect ;
          Future ;
          Conditional ;
          Durative ;
          Optative ;
          SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Ita
0:ta      PresentTense ;
0:ta      PreteriteK ;
0:ta      Imperfect ;
0:ta      Future ;
          Conditional ;
0:s       Durative ;
0:a       Optative ;
0:a       SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase2-a
0:a       PresentTense ;
          PreteriteNull ;
0:a       Imperfect ;
0:a       Future ;
0:a       Conditional ;
          Durative ;
0:a       Optative ;
          SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase2-i
0:i       PresentTense ;
          PreteriteNull ;
0:i       Imperfect ;
0:i       Future ;
0:i       Conditional ;
          Durative ;
0:i       Optative ;
          SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase3
0:a       PresentTense ;
          PreteriteJ ;
0:a       Imperfect ;
          Future ;
          Conditional ;
0:j       Durative ;
          Optative ;
          SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON TAM-Clase4
          PresentTense ;
          PreteriteJ ;
          Imperfect ;
          Future ;
          Conditional ;
0:j       Durative ;
          Optative ;
          SufijoAuxiliar ;

LEXICON SufijoAuxiliar
Tinemi-Aux ;
Tijtia-Aux ;
Tiuits-Aux ;
Purposive ;

LEXICON Tinemi-Aux
%+%<aux%>nemi:%>ti%>nemi        PresentTense ;
%+%<aux%>nemi:%>ti%>nemi        Imperfect ;
%+%<aux%>nemi:%>ti%>nemi        Future ;
%+%<aux%>nemi:%>ti%>nen         Durative ;

LEXICON Tijtia-Aux ! "hacer algo poco a poquito"
%+%<aux%>ijtia:%>ti%>jtia        PresentTense ;
%+%<aux%>ijtia:%>ti%>jtia        Imperfect ;
%+%<aux%>ijtia:%>ti%>jti         Future ;
%+%<aux%>ijtia:%>ti%>jti         Durative ;

LEXICON Tiuits-Aux
%+uits%<aux%>:%>ti%>uits      Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%+uits%<aux%>:%>ti%>uits%>ej  Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%+uits%<aux%>:%>ti%>uits%>e   Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Neki-Aux
%+neki%<aux%>:%>neki  PresentTense ;

LEXICON Purposive
%<pres%>%<and%>:%>ti Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<and%>:%>ti%>j Agr-Pl-Nonpast ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>%<and%>:%>ti%>ue Agr-Pl-Nonpast ;
%<pret%>%<and%>:%>to Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>%<and%>:%>to%>j Agr-Pl-Past ;

%<pres%>%<ven%>:%>ki     Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pres%>%<ven%>:%>ki%>j  Agr-Sg-Nonpast ; ! Dir/LR
%<pres%>%<ven%>:%>ki%>ue Agr-Sg-Nonpast ;
%<pret%>%<ven%>:%>ko     Agr-Sg-Past ;
%<pret%>%<ven%>:%>ko%>j  Agr-Sg-Past ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Verb lexica
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON IV-Raiz

ajsi%<iv%>:ajsi                         TAM-Clase1 ; ! "llegar thitherly"
palti%<iv%>:palti                       TAM-Clase1 ; ! "mojarse"
tlejko%<iv%>:tlehko                     TAM-Clase1 ; !" climb, ascend"
ejko%<iv%>:ejko                         TAM-Clase1 ; !" arrive hitherly"
tsajtsi%<iv%>:tsajtsi                   TAM-Clase1 ; ! "yell"
choka%<iv%>:choka                       TAM-Clase1 ; ! "cry"
panoa%<iv%>:pano                        TAM-Panoa  ; ! "pasar/suceder"


nejnemi%<iv%>:nejne%{M%}                TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "walk"
kualani%<iv%>:kualan                    TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "get angry"
kalaki%<iv%>:kalak                      TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "enter"
kochi%<iv%>:koch                        TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "sleep"
uetsi%<iv%>:uets                        TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "fall"
miki%<iv%>:mik                          TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "die"
paqui%<iv%>:pak                         TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "be happy"
patlani%<iv%>:patlan                    TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "fly"
nemi%<iv%>:ne%{m%}                      TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "go around (andar)"
tsekuini%<iv%>:tsekuin                  TAM-Clase2-i ; ! "jump"
poliui%<iv%>:poliu                      TAM-Clase2-i;  ! "get lost"

pinaua%<iv%>:pina%{u%}                  TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "be ashamed"
peua%<iv%>:pe%{u%}                      TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "start
kisa%<iv%>:kis                          TAM-Clase2-a ; ! "emerge, go out"

kualtia%<iv%>:kualti	                TAM-Clase3 ; ! "servir/estar bueno/no pudrido"
tlajtoa%<iv%>:tlajto	                TAM-Clase3 ; ! "hablar"
choloa%<iv%>:cholo                      TAM-Clase3 ; ! "flee"
chantia%<iv%>:chanti	                TAM-Clase3 ; ! "vivir"


ueli%<iv%>:ueli		       TAM-Clase4 ; ! TODO is this even correct
